incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<!--
     Generated from Hindi morph analyser at: http://ltrc.iiit.net/~anusaaraka/

     by

     Amba Kulkarni, University of Hyderabad
 -->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="cat:n" c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="cat:p" c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>
    <sdef n="cat:adj" c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cat:sh" c="shashthi"/>
    <sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
    <sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>
    <sdef n="gen:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
    <sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
    <sdef n="case:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="case:Shashthi" c="shashthi"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:ne" c="ne"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:ko" c="ko"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
    <sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>
    <sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
    <sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>
    <sdef n="num:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="fnum:s" c="following noun singular"/>
    <sdef n="fnum:p" c="following noun plural"/>
    <sdef n="fnum:any" c="following noun num any"/>
    <sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
    <sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>
    <sdef n="per:m_h" c="second_honorific"/>
    <sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>
    <sdef n="per:any" c="any"/>
    <sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
    <sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
    <sdef n="tam:future" c="future"/>
    <sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
    <sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
    <sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="anek/a__adj">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amIra/__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="case:any"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bAlikA/__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bAlaka/__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kAlI/__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kAl/A__adj">
      <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:adj"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="acUka"><i>acUka</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="agrayAyI"><i>agrayAyI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="AiMxA"><i>AiMx</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="akArya"><i>akArya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aKilA"><i>aKil</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="akRayI"><i>akRayI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alagAU"><i>alagAU</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alpabuxXi"><i>alpabuxXi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="alpAyu"><i>alpAyu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amarxiwa"><i>amarxiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ameyAwmA"><i>ameyAwm</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="AmiRaBojI"><i>AmiRaBojI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amoGaxqRti"><i>amoGaxqRti</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amqwyu"><i>amqwyu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="amUrwi"><i>amUrwi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anamanA"><i>anaman</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anarGa"><i>anarGa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anasunI"><i>anasunI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aneka"><i>anek</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anugawArWa"><i>anugawArWa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anuhAri"><i>anuhAri</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="anuRaMgI"><i>anuRaMgI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="apakqRta"><i>apakqRta</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="apAraxarSI"><i>apAraxarSI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="apawi"><i>apawi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="apraBu"><i>apraBu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aprawyakRa"><i>aprawyakRa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="areNu"><i>areNu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arjunacCavi"><i>arjunacCavi</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arWArWI"><i>arWArWI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="asaMKya"><i>asaMKya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aSvArUDa"><i>aSvArUD</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="asWAyI"><i>asWAyI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aTAraha"><i>aTAraha</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avaswu"><i>avaswu</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="avikArI"><i>avikArI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="AviRta"><i>AviRta</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="AwmavAxI"><i>AwmavAxI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="awyaXika"><i>awyaXika</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="aXaHSirA"><i>aXaHSir</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ayoni"><i>ayoni</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Ayukwa"><i>Ayukwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="badaBAgI"><i>badaBAgI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baDiyA"><i>baDiyA</i><par n="bAlikA/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bAharavAlA"><i>bAharavAl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bAjarU"><i>bAjarU</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bakaXyAnI"><i>bakaXyAnI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bAlaka"><i>bAlaka</i><par n="bAlaka/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bAlikA"><i>bAlikA</i><par n="bAlikA/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bAsI"><i>bAsI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baxaparaheja"><i>baxaparaheja</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="BayAvanA"><i>BayAvan</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="BexavAxI"><i>BexavAxI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="BOcakkA"><i>BOcakk</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="boxA"><i>box</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="BqSa"><i>BqSa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="brahmayoni"><i>brahmayoni</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="byAhawA"><i>byAhaw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="CamaCama"><i>CamaCam</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cattAnI"><i>cattAnI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cikanA"><i>cikan</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ciMwAkula"><i>ciMwAkula</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cOMkAnevAlA"><i>cOMkAnevAl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="CuttA"><i>Cutt</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ESa"><i>ESa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gadA"><i>gad</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="GamaMdI"><i>GamaMdI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="GinOnA"><i>GinOn</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="guNADya"><i>guNADya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="harABarA"><i>harABar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="havAlAwI"><i>havAlAwI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hEMgiMga"><i>hEMgiMga</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="iwanI"><i>iwanI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="JabarA"><i>Jabar</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jAnakAra"><i>jAnakAra</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaccA"><i>kacc</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaI"><i>kaI</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="KAkI"><i>KAkI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kalamuhAz"><i>kalamuhAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kApAla"><i>kApAla</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="KaracIlA"><i>KaracIl</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kEsI"><i>kEsI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kirakirA"><i>kirakir</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kRawa"><i>kRawa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kuCa"><i>kuC</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="labXA"><i>labX</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lakRabeXI"><i>lakRabeXI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lavaNa"><i>lavaNa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mahAyaSA"><i>mahAyaS</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maMwrahIna"><i>maMwrahIna</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="manamAnA"><i>manamAn</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="manohArI"><i>manohArI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miSriwa"><i>miSriwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miwaBojI"><i>miwaBojI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="miWyA"><i>miWy</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nAkArA"><i>nAkAr</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naRtaXana"><i>naRtaXana</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="navaraMgI"><i>navaraMgI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="niruwsAha"><i>niruwsAha</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="niwAMwa"><i>niwAMw</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="OMXA"><i>OMX</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="PalAz"><i>PalAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="PalAzPalAz"><i>PalAzPalAz</i><par n="anek/a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pApanASI"><i>pApanASI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="parivarjiwa"><i>parivarjiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pAwakI"><i>pAwakI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pAzcavA"><i>pAzcav</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="praSaMsiwa"><i>praSaMsiwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pravakwA"><i>pravakw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prawyakRaxarSI"><i>prawyakRaxarSI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="qwaXAmA"><i>qwaXAm</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="RatakarNa"><i>RatakarNa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="saccI"><i>saccI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="samAharwA"><i>samAharw</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="saMjAwa"><i>saMjAwa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="saMkrAmI"><i>saMkrAmI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sapwajihva"><i>sapwajihva</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sarvesarvA"><i>sarvesarv</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sarvopakArI"><i>sarvopakArI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sIXI"><i>sIXI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="SmaSAnika"><i>SmaSAnika</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sUKA"><i>sUK</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="upagAmI"><i>upagAmI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="upalakRya"><i>upalakRya</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="uTallU"><i>uTallU</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="varaxAnI"><i>varaxAnI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vicArajFa"><i>vicArajFa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wiraCA"><i>wiraC</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wirAsI"><i>wirAsI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xarxamaMxa"><i>xarxamaMxa</i><par n="amIra/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xoraMgA"><i>xoraMg</i><par n="kAl/A__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="yogAByAsI"><i>yogAByAsI</i><par n="kAlI/__adj"/></e>
